New York, session 2025-2026, A1917.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 3 of section 3309-a of the 2 public health law, as added by section 1 of part A of chapter 71 of the 3 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the department of education 5 and the office of [alcoholism and substance abuse] addiction services 6 and supports, shall establish standards and review and approve course 7 work or training in pain management, palliative care, and addiction and 8 update such standards and approvals as necessary according to best prac- 9 tices for providing patient centered care with the consideration of 10 social determinants of health and co-occuring disorders and shall 11 publish information related to such standards, course work or training 12 on the department's website. 13 § 2. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 3 of section 3309-a of the public 14 health law, as added by section 1 of part A of chapter 71 of the laws of 15 2016, is amended to read as follows: 16 (f) Course work or training shall include, but not be limited to: 17 state and federal requirements for prescribing controlled substances; 18 pain management; appropriate prescribing; managing acute pain; pallia- 19 tive medicine; prevention, screening and signs of [addiction] substance 20 use disorder; responses to abuse and addiction; and end of life care. 21 For each licensed person due to re-register pursuant to this subdivision 22 after July first, two thousand twenty-six, such course work or training 23 shall also include techniques that will reduce the likelihood of over- 24 dose and other harms related to the use of controlled substances and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05434-01-5 A. 1917 2 1 medications used for the treatment of addiction, including information 2 about becoming a buprenorphine prescriber. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 4 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 5 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 6 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 7 completed by the department of health in consultation with the state 8 education department and the office of addiction services and supports 9 on or before such effective date.